Louisiana, session 2026, HB1033.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:61(B)(introductory paragraph) and (1)(a)(v) are hereby amended
and reenacted and R.S. 14:61(B)(1)(a)(viii) through (x) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§61. Unauthorized entry of a critical infrastructure
* * *
B. For the purposes of this Section, the following words shall have the
following meanings:
(1)(a) "Critical infrastructure" means any and all structures, sites, equipment,
or other immovable or movable property located within or upon any of the
following:
* * *
(v) Transportation facilities, such as ports, railroad switching yards,
pipelines, and trucking terminals, airports, heliports, spaceports, aerospace facilities,
landing strips, mass transit and passenger rail terminals, postal facilities, and freight
transportation facilities.
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1033 ENROLLED
(viii) Government facilities.
(ix) Military installations.
(x) Oil and gas exploration platforms, vehicles, and equipment, including
wireline equipment.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 51:3052(introductory paragraph) and (2) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§3052. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings
ascribed unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
* * *
(2) "Critical infrastructure" means a any of the following:
(a) A communication infrastructure system,.
(b) A cybersecurity system,.
(c) An electric grid,.
(d) A hazardous waste treatment system, or.
(e) A water treatment facility.
(f) Transportation facilities, such as ports, railroad switching yards,
pipelines, trucking terminals, airports, heliports, spaceports, aerospace facilities,
landing strips, mass transit and passenger rail terminals, postal facilities, and freight
transportation facilities.
(g) Water control structures, including floodgates or pump stations.
(h) Wireline, wireless communications, and data network internet facilities,
and any equipment or communication wires that are connected or appurtenant to the
facilities, including but not limited to broadcast television equipment, video
equipment, fiber optics, and any lines or wires that are used for transmission from
the facilities.
(i) Government facilities.
(j) Military installations.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1033 ENROLLED
(k) Oil and gas exploration platforms, vehicles, and equipment, including
wireline equipment.
* * *
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.